District of Columbia statutes.
42-202

Exemption from recordation and transfer tax.

(a)

(1)

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a conservation easement may be created, conveyed, recorded, assigned, released, modified, terminated, or otherwise altered or affected in the same manner as other easements, provided that the recordation of any conservation easement as defined in § 42-201, or of any assignment, release, modification, termination, or other alteration of a conservation easement shall be exempt from the recordation tax imposed by § 42-1103, and from the transfer tax imposed by § 47-903.

(2)

The exemption provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply if the consideration for the conservation easement exceeds $100 in value.

(b)

No right or duty in favor of or against a person having a third-party right of enforcement arises under a conservation easement before its acceptance by the holder and a recordation of the acceptance.

(c)

Except as provided in § 42-203(b), a conservation easement is unlimited in duration unless the instrument creating it otherwise provides.

(d)

An interest in real property in existence at the time a conservation easement is created is not impaired by it unless the owner of the interest is a party to the conservation easement or consents to it.

(e)

A conservation easement is valid even under the following circumstances:

(1)

It is not appurtenant to an interest in real property;

(2)

It can be or has been assigned to another holder;

(3)

It is not of a character that has been recognized traditionally at common law;

(4)

It imposes a negative burden;

(5)

It imposes affirmative obligations upon the owner of an interest in the burdened property or upon the holder;

(6)

The benefit does not touch or concern real property; or

(7)

There is no privity of estate or of contract.

May 16, 1986, D.C. Law 6-113, § 3, 33 DCR 1996
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 25, 35 DCR 147
Tax on deeds, imposition and return, see § 42-1103.
1981 Ed., § 45-2602.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon §§ 2 and 4 of the Uniform Conservation Easement Act.